North Carolina statutes. Chapter 57D. North Carolina Limited Liability Company Act.
Part 1. Purposes and Powers.

§ 57D-2-01.
Nature, purposes, duration, existence.

An LLC is an entity distinct from its interest owners.

An LLC has perpetual duration.

Subject to subsection (d) of this section, an LLC may engage in any lawful business.

A limited liability company engaging in a business that is subject to regulation under another statute of this State may be formed or authorized to transact business under this Chapter if not precluded by the other statute and is otherwise subject to the application of the other statute, which in the case of a limited liability company rendering a professional service requires giving effect to

G.S. 57D-2-02

.

After the dissolution of an LLC, the LLC continues its existence but shall wind up pursuant to

G.S. 57D-6-07

.

History.

2013-157, s. 2.

§ 57D-2-02.
Professional limited liability companies.

Except as set forth in this subsection, a limited liability company may engage in rendering professional services only to the extent that it would be able to render those services were it a corporation, including, as applicable, complying with Chapter 55B of the General Statutes and the statutes referenced in the definition of “professional service” in

G.S. 55B-2(6)

. Chapter 55B of the General Statutes and each statute referenced therein are deemed amended and to apply with such changes as are necessary to cause them to be applicable to limited liability companies in the same degree as for corporations but subject to any provisions contained herein pursuant to which limited liability companies, or their members, managers, and other company officials, are treated differently from corporations, or their shareholders, directors, and officers.For purposes of applying the provisions, conditions, and limitations of Chapter 55B of the General Statutes and the statutes referenced therein to limited liability companies that engage in rendering professional services, unless the context specifically requires otherwise, the following rules of construction shall apply:

References to Chapter 55 of the General Statutes are treated as references to this Chapter, and references to a “corporation” or “foreign corporation” are treated as references to an LLC or foreign LLC, respectively.

References to “articles of incorporation” are treated as references to articles of organization.

The persons executing the articles of organization of an LLC are treated in the same manner as the incorporators of a professional corporation.

References to “directors” are treated as references to company officials having equal or greater authority in the management of a limited liability company as directors of a domestic corporation or foreign corporation, as the case may be.

References to “officers” are treated as references to company officials whose authority to manage the limited liability company is equal to or greater than that exercised by officers of a domestic corporation.

A professional limited liability company is not required to have more than one company official who would be treated as a director, officer, or both under Chapter 55B of the General Statutes.

A manager or other company official who has the authority of both a director and an officer if the limited liability were a company or a corporation is to be treated as holding both positions for purposes of applying Chapter 55B of the General Statutes to the limited liability company.

References to “shares” of a shareholder are treated as references to the ownership interest of an interest owner and, where the context so indicates or requires, a portion of an interest owner’s ownership interest.

References to “shareholders” are treated as references to interest owners.

The name of a limited liability company that is to render a professional service and is subject to this section shall comply with Article 3 of Chapter 55D of the General Statutes and, in addition, shall contain the word “Professional” or the abbreviation “P.L.L.C.” or “PLLC.”

Nothing in this Chapter abolishes, modifies, restricts, limits, or alters the law in this State applicable to the professional relationship and liabilities between the individual furnishing the professional services and the person receiving the professional services, the standards of professional conduct applicable to the rendering of the services, or any responsibilities, obligations, or sanctions imposed under applicable licensing statutes. A member, manager, or other company official of a professional limited liability company is not individually liable, directly or indirectly, including by indemnification, contribution, assessment, or otherwise, for debts, obligations, and liabilities of, or chargeable to, the professional limited liability company that arise from errors, omissions, negligence, malpractice, incompetence, or malfeasance committed by another member, manager, or other company official, employee, agent, or other representative of the professional limited liability company, except nothing in this Chapter affects the liability of a member, manager, or other company official of a professional limited liability company for his or her own errors, omissions, negligence, malpractice, incompetence, or malfeasance committed in the rendering of professional services.

History.

2013-157, s. 2.

§ 57D-2-03.
Powers of the LLC.

Unless this Chapter provides otherwise or the powers of the LLC are limited under the operating agreement, an LLC has the same powers as an individual or a domestic corporation to do all things necessary or convenient to carry out its business.

History.

2013-157, s. 2.

§§ 57D-2-04 through 57D-2-19.

Reserved for future codification purposes.